Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 3

Misconduct

18-1-301. Grounds for removal.

The court may remove its clerk:

Upon conviction of a misdemeanor in office or of a felony;

For nonresidence in the county in which the court is held;

For failing to give security as required by law;

For failing to pay over public moneys or moneys collected officially;

For incapacity, neglect of duty or misbehavior in office; and

For any other cause to which the penalty of removal from office is attached by law.

Code 1858, § 4061 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 17, § 1); Shan., § 5876; Code 1932, § 10076; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-119.

Cross-References. Removal of supreme court clerk, §18-3-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 7, 13; 8 Tenn. Juris., Criminal Procedure, § 4.

Cited: Marshall v. Sevier County, 639 S.W.2d 440, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 396 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982).

18-1-302. Suspension on indictment.

Immediately upon indictment found against any clerk for a felony or misdemeanor in office, the court of which the clerk is clerk may suspend the clerk from office and appoint a clerk pro tempore, until a final decision can be had, who shall be entitled to the fees and perquisites of office during the suspension.

Code 1858, § 4062 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 17, § 2); Shan., § 5877; Code 1932, § 10077; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-120.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 7.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 8, 80.

Clerks of Courts
8.

18-1-303. Proof of improper conduct of office.

The failure to pay over money collected officially, incapacity, neglect of duty and misbehavior in office may be shown by the record of a suit, by motion, or otherwise founded upon one (1) of the causes, and decided adversely to the clerk; or charges may be exhibited to the court, in writing, by any person, and satisfactorily established by proof, the clerk having a right to be heard in defense, and to an appeal, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 4063; Shan., § 5878; Code 1932, § 10078; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-121.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 7.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 81.

18-1-304. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §18-1-304 (Code 1858, § 4064; Code 1932, § 10079; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-122), concerning prosecution of charges against clerk, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 8.

18-1-305. Misdemeanor in office — Penalty.

Any clerk who willfully or corruptly does any act contrary to the duties of such clerk's office, as prescribed by law, or, in like manner, omits or refuses to perform any service or duty required of the clerk, unless some other penalty is expressly provided, commits a Class C misdemeanor and may be removed from office.

Code 1858, § 4065 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 17, § 1); Shan., § 5880; Code 1932, § 10080; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-123; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts § 78.

18-1-306. False entries to affect causes.

Any clerk who knowingly and willfully makes a false entry, knowingly and willfully fails to make an entry required by law to be made, or knowingly and willfully makes out an imperfect or incorrect transcript of the proceedings had in the clerk's court, with the intent to affect the result of any cause, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 4066; Shan., § 5881; Code 1932, § 10081; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-124; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 111.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Special Project: Criminal Procedure as Defined by the Tennessee Supreme Court (Julian L. Bibb and Walter Sillers Weems), 30 Vand. L. Rev. (4) 691.

Attorney General Opinions. Publication of criminal court records on the Internet, OAG 00-058 (3/31/00).

Collateral References. 14 C.J.S. Clerks of Courts §§ 8, 79.